New Jersey, session 222, S1491.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 7 of P.L.1996, c.8 (C.52:14-15.1a) is amended to read as follows: 7.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the State Treasurer on behalf of the State, and the governing body of an independent State authority, board, commission, corporation, agency or organization may establish as an employer a cafeteria plan for its employees pursuant to section 125 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. s.125, and shall establish such a plan for medical or dental expenses not covered by a health benefits plan.  The plan shall provide for a reduction in an employee's salary, through payroll deductions or otherwise, in exchange for payment by the employer of medical or dental expenses not covered by a health benefits plan, and may provide for a reduction in an employee's salary, through payroll deductions or otherwise, in exchange for payment by the employer of dependent care expenses as provided in section 129 of the code, 26 U.S.C. s.129, and such other benefits as are consistent with section 125 which are included under the plan.  The limitation on the amount of any reduction in an employees salary for the purpose of contributing to a flexible spending account as provided for by the plan shall be the limitation as adjusted for inflation annually provided in section 125 of the code, 26 U.S.C. s.125(i).  The amount of any reduction in an employee's salary for the purpose of contributing to the plan shall continue to be treated as regular compensation for all other purposes, including the calculation of pension contributions and the amount of any retirement allowance, but, to the extent permitted by the federal Internal Revenue Code, shall not be included in the computation of federal taxes withheld from the employee's salary. (cf: P.L.2011, c.78, s.53) 2.    Section 44 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.18A:16-19.1) is amended to read as follows: 44.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, a board of education, or an agency or instrumentality thereof, may establish as an employer a cafeteria plan for its employees pursuant to section 125 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. s.125, and shall establish such a plan for medical or dental expenses not covered by a health benefits plan.  The plan shall provide for a reduction in an employee's salary, through payroll deductions or otherwise, in exchange for payment by the employer of medical or dental expenses not covered by a health benefits plan, and may provide for a reduction in an employee's salary, through payroll deductions or otherwise, in exchange for payment by the employer of dependent care expenses as provided in section 129 of the code, 26 U.S.C. s.129, and such other benefits as are consistent with section 125 which are included under the plan.  The limitation on the amount of any reduction in an employees salary for the purpose of contributing to a flexible spending account as provided for by the plan shall be the limitation as adjusted for inflation annually provided in section 125 of the code, 26 U.S.C. s.125(i). The amount of any reduction in an employee's salary for the purpose of contributing to the plan shall continue to be treated as regular compensation for all other purposes, including the calculation of pension contributions and the amount of any retirement allowance, but, to the extent permitted by the federal Internal Revenue Code, shall not be included in the computation of federal taxes withheld from the employee's salary. (cf: P.L.2011, c.78, s.51) 3.    Section 45 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.40A:10-23.5) is amended to read as follows: 45.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, a local unit of government, or an agency, board, commission, authority or instrumentality thereof, may establish as an employer a cafeteria plan for its employees pursuant to section 125 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. s.125, and shall establish such a plan for medical or dental expenses not covered by a health benefits plan.  The plan shall provide for a reduction in an employee's salary, through payroll deductions or otherwise, in exchange for payment by the employer of medical or dental expenses not covered by a health benefits plan, and may provide for a reduction in an employee's salary, through payroll deductions or otherwise, in exchange for payment by the employer of dependent care expenses as provided in section 129 of the code, 26 U.S.C. s.129, and such other benefits as are consistent with section 125 which are included under the plan.  The limitation on the amount of any reduction in an employees salary for the purpose of contributing to a flexible spending account as provided for by the plan shall be the limitation as adjusted for inflation annually provided in section 125 of the code, 26 U.S.C. s.125(i).  The amount of any reduction in an employee's salary for the purpose of contributing to the plan shall continue to be treated as regular compensation for all other purposes, including the calculation of pension contributions and the amount of any retirement allowance, but, to the extent permitted by the federal Internal Revenue Code, shall not be included in the computation of federal taxes withheld from the employee's salary. (cf: P.L.2011, c.78, s.52) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.